Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,107
Liability.

The director and the administrator under the Public Funds Deposit Security Act shall, except for actions or inactions that constitute gross negligence or intentional wrongful acts, be immune from liability for any act required of or authorized for the director and the administrator under the act.

Laws 2019, LB622, § 14.